Utah statutes.
32A-1-802.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Malted beverages" means:
(a)  beer;
(b)  a flavored malt beverage; and
(c)  heavy beer.
(2)  "Packaging" means the outer packaging that is visible to a consumer such
as a carton, case, or other wrapper of a container.
